Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2507
Poisons; sale by person not registered pharmacist prohibited; exception.

It shall be unlawful for any person, other than a duly registered pharmacist, to sell or dispense poisons as named in section 71-2501, except as otherwise provided in section 71-2501.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 14, p. 565;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-933;

R.S.1943, § 81-631;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 84.